Hawaii statutes.
§200D-2 Kaneohe Bay regional council;
establishment. (a) There is established within the department of land and
natural resources, for administrative purposes only, the Kaneohe Bay regional
council; provided that except for the participation on the council of the two
representatives from the department of land and natural resources as ex officio
nonvoting members pursuant to subsection (c) and except as provided under
section 26-35, the department of land and natural resources shall not provide
administrative support to the council, including providing staff, drafting, and
other support at council meetings. The council shall be composed of seven
voting members appointed by the governor in accordance with section 26-34 and
ex officio nonvoting members as provided in subsection (c). The members shall
serve without compensation.

(b) The voting members of the council shall
include one representative from each of the following: the Kaneohe
neighborhood board, the Kahaluu neighborhood board, the Kaneohe Bay Commercial
Operators Association, the Kaneohe Bay fishing panel established by this
chapter, a Kaneohe Bay recreational boating association, the Hawaii institute
of marine biology of the University of Hawaii, and the office of Hawaiian
affairs.

(c) The director of health; a representative
of the department of land and natural resources division of boating and ocean
recreation; the administrator of the aquatic resources division; the commanding
officer of the Kaneohe Marine Corps Air Station; and the director of the office
of planning; or their designated representatives shall serve as ex officio[,]
nonvoting members of the council. Additionally, the council may designate
representatives of other appropriate agencies as ex officio[,] nonvoting
members of the council.

(d) Four voting members shall constitute a
quorum to do business and any action taken by the council shall be validated by
a simple majority of the quorum.

(e) The chairperson shall be the administrator
of the aquatic resources division. [L 1993, c 317, pt of §2, §7; am L
1996, c 299, §3; am L 1998, c 4, §3; am L 2009, c 68, §1; am L 2010, c 19, §§1,
4; am L 2014, c 85, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next